Washington statutes.
RCW 2.08.110

Apportionment between counties in joint judicial district.

Where there is only one judge of the superior court for two or more counties, the auditors thereof, acting together, shall apportion among or between such counties, according to the assessed valuation of their taxable property, the amount of such judge's salary that each county shall pay.

[ 1890 p 329 s 3; RRS s 10968.]